Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB558.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 207. Rental Applications. --( a) A landlord or the landlord's agent may not charge a rental application fee of more than twenty dollars ($20) to apply to enter into a rental agreement for a residential dwelling unit.(b) A landlord or the landlord's agent may only use a rental application fee to conduct a background check on the applicant. A background check under this subsection shall include a check <--12345678910111213141516171819 of the applicant's criminal history record and credit score. ONLY CHARGE A FEE THAT IS REASONABLY RELATED TO THE ACTUAL ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES INCURRED AND MAY NOT USE FEES AS A GENERAL REVENUE SOURCE.(c) (B) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a person from charging OR REQUIRE A PERSON TO CHARGE a rental application fee to apply to enter into a rental agreement for commercial , RESIDENTIAL or nonresidential property. Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0558PN3170 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789